Utah statutes.
34-23-402.   Violation -- Criminal penalty.
(1)  The commission may prosecute a misdemeanor criminal action in the name of
the state.  The county attorney, district attorney, or attorney general shall
provide assistance in prosecutions under this section at the request of the
commission.
(2)  It is a class B misdemeanor for a person, whether individually or as an
officer, agent, or employee of any person, firm, or corporation to:
(a)  knowingly employ a minor or permit a minor to work in a repeated
violation of this chapter;
(b)  refuse or knowingly neglect to furnish to the commission, any information
requested by the commission under this chapter;
(c)  refuse access to that person's place of business or employment to the
commission or its authorized representative when access has been requested in
conjunction with an investigation related to this section;
(d)  hinder the commission or its authorized representative in the securing of
any information authorized by this section;
(e)  refuse or knowingly omit or neglect to keep any of the records required
by this chapter;
(f)  knowingly make any false statement, representation, or certification in
any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to
be maintained under this chapter;
(g)  discharge an employee or threaten to or retaliate against an employee
because:
(i)  the employee has testified;
(ii)  is about to testify; or
(iii)  the employer believes that the employee may testify in any
investigation or proceedings relative to the enforcement of this chapter; and
(h)  willfully violate any order issued under this chapter.
(3)  This section does not apply to violations of Section 34-23-301.
